Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-1,124
Emergencies; terms, defined.

As used in sections 8-1,124 to 8-1,129, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Emergency means any condition or occurrence, actual or threatened, which interferes physically with the conduct of normal business operations at one or more or all of the offices of a financial institution, or which poses an imminent or existing threat to the safety or security of persons or property, or both, including, but not limited to, fire, flood, earthquake, hurricane, wind, rain, snow storm, labor dispute and strike, power failure, cybersecurity event as defined in section 87-1201, transportation failure, interruption of a communication facility, shortage of fuel, housing, food, transportation, or labor, robbery or attempted robbery, actual or threatened enemy attack, epidemic or other catastrophe, riot, civil commotion, and any other act of lawlessness or violence, actual or threatened;

(2) Financial institution means a bank, savings bank, building and loan association, savings and loan association, credit union, or trust company, or any office thereof, chartered by the department;

(3) Office means any place at which a financial institution transacts its business or conducts operations related to its business; and

(4) Officers means the person or persons designated by the board of directors, supervisory committee, or other governing body of a financial institution, to act for such financial institution in an emergency or, in the absence of any such designation or of such officer or officers, the president or any other officer in charge of such financial institution or of such office or offices.

Laws 1971, LB 523, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 116;

Laws 2026, LB717, § 6.
July 18, 2026